Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 8

Taxes and Fees

45-4-801. [Reserved.]

At the time of incorporation, every credit union shall pay the secretary of state a fee of ten dollars ($10.00).

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 25; Shan. Supp., § 2198a32; Code 1932, § 3859; Acts 1931, ch. 67, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3859; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1830; Acts 1985, ch. 17, § 8.

45-4-803. State and federal credit unions to be equally subject to taxation.

Except for taxes on property and the credit union fees provided by law, no tax levied by this state, whether privilege, excise, franchise, sales or otherwise, shall be levied upon or be applicable to any credit union chartered under the laws of this state unless and until the same tax may be legally levied upon and be applicable to federally chartered credit unions in this state, in which case the tax shall be levied upon and be applicable to the state and federally chartered credit unions.

Acts 1980, ch. 559, § 3.